Illinois, session 104th, SB3597.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Sections 2605-30, 2605-51, 2605-52, and 2605-350 as follows:  7    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-30)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a-2)8    Sec. 2605-30. Division of Patrol (formerly State 9Troopers). The Division of Patrol shall exercise the following 10functions and those in Section 2605-35:11        (1) (Blank). Cooperate with federal and State 12    authorities requesting utilization of the Illinois State 13    Police's radio network system under the Illinois 14    Aeronautics Act.15        (2) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties of the 16    Illinois State Police under the Illinois State Police Act.17        (2.5) Provide uniformed patrol of Illinois highways 18    and proactively enforce criminal and traffic laws. 19        (3) (Blank).20        (4) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties of the 21    Illinois State Police vested by law in the Illinois State 22    Police by the Illinois Vehicle Code.23        (5) Exercise other duties that have been or may be   SB3597 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    vested by law in the Illinois State Police.2        (6) Exercise other duties that may be assigned by the 3    Director in order to fulfill the responsibilities and to 4    achieve the purposes of the Illinois State Police.5        (7) Provide comprehensive law enforcement services to 6    the public and to county, municipal, and federal law 7    enforcement agencies, at their request.8        (8) Patrol Illinois highways, with the intent to 9    interdict crime, and ensure traffic safety, and assist 10    while assisting citizens during times of need. 11        (9) Enforce the provisions of Chapter 18b of the 12    Illinois Vehicle Code and serve as the lead State agency 13    for administering the motor carrier safety assistance 14    program of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety 15    Administration. 16(Source: P.A. 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 104-157, eff. 1-1-26.) 17    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-51)18    Sec. 2605-51. Division of the Academy and Training.19    (a) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 20exercise, but not be limited to, the following functions:21        (1) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police 22    Training Academy.23        (2) Train and prepare new officers for a career in law 24    enforcement, with innovative, quality training and 25    educational practices.  SB3597 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1        (3) Offer continuing training and educational programs 2    for Illinois State Police employees.3        (4) Oversee the Illinois State Police's recruitment 4    initiatives.5        (5) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police's 6    quartermaster.7        (6) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 8    Article 5, Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code 9    concerning testing and training officers on the detection 10    of impaired driving.11        (7) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 12    Article 108B of the Code of Criminal Procedure. 13    (a-5) Successful completion of the Illinois State Police 14Academy satisfies the minimum standards pursuant to 15subsections (a), (b), and (d) of Section 7 of the Illinois 16Police Training Act and exempts Illinois State Police officers 17from the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board's 18State Comprehensive Examination and Equivalency Examination. 19Satisfactory completion shall be evidenced by a commission or 20certificate issued to the officer. 21    (b) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 22exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested in the former 23Division of State Troopers by Section 17 of the Illinois State 24Police Act.25    (c) Specialized training. The Division of the Academy and 26Training shall provide the following specialized training:   SB3597 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1        (1) Crash reconstruction specialist; training. The 2    Division of the Academy and Training shall cooperate with 3    the Division of Forensic Services to provide specialized 4    training in crash reconstruction for Illinois State Police 5    officers. Only Illinois State Police officers who 6    successfully complete the training may be assigned as 7    crash reconstruction specialists.8        (2) Death and homicide investigations; training. The 9    Division of the Academy and Training shall provide 10    training in death and homicide investigation for Illinois 11    State Police officers. Only Illinois State Police officers 12    who successfully complete the training may be assigned as 13    lead investigators in death and homicide investigations. 14    Satisfactory completion of the training shall be evidenced 15    by a certificate issued to the officer by the Division of 16    the Academy and Training. The Director shall develop a 17    process for waiver applications for officers whose prior 18    training and experience as homicide investigators may 19    qualify them for a waiver. The Director may issue a 20    waiver, at his or her discretion, based solely on the 21    prior training and experience of an officer as a homicide 22    investigator.23            (A) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 24        require all homicide investigator training to include 25        instruction on victim-centered, trauma-informed 26        investigation. This training must be implemented by   SB3597 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1        July 1, 2023.2            (B) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 3        cooperate with the Division of Criminal Investigation 4        to develop a model curriculum on victim-centered, 5        trauma-informed investigation. This curriculum must be 6        implemented by July 1, 2023. 7        (3) Investigation of officer-involved criminal sexual 8    assault; training. The Division of the Academy and 9    Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 10    Investigation to provide a specialized criminal sexual 11    assault and sexual abuse investigation training program 12    for Illinois State Police officers. Only Illinois State 13    Police officers who successfully complete the training may 14    be assigned as investigators in officer-involved criminal 15    sexual assault investigations under Section 10 of the Law 16    Enforcement Criminal Sexual Assault Investigation Act. 17        (4) Investigation of officer-involved deaths; 18    training. The Division of the Academy and Training shall 19    have a written policy regarding the investigation of 20    officer-involved deaths that involve a law enforcement 21    officer employed by the Illinois State Police as required 22    under Section 1-10 of the Police and Community Relations 23    Improvement Act and shall provide specialized training in 24    that policy for Illinois State Police officers. 25        (5) Juvenile specialist; training. The Division of the 26    Academy and Training shall provide specialized juvenile   SB3597 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    training for Illinois State Police officers who meet the 2    definition of "juvenile police officer" as defined under 3    paragraph (17) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 4    1987. Juvenile specialists may complete questioning of 5    juveniles on school grounds as provided under Section 6    22-88 of the School Code. 7        (6) Peer support program; training. The Division of 8    the Academy and Training shall cooperate with the Office 9    of the Director to provide peer support advisors with 10    appropriate specialized training in counseling to conduct 11    peer support counseling sessions under Section 10 of the 12    First Responders Suicide Prevention Act. 13        (7) Police dog training standards; training. All 14    police dogs used by the Illinois State Police for drug 15    enforcement purposes pursuant to the Cannabis Control Act, 16    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, and the 17    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act shall 18    be trained by programs that meet the certification 19    requirements set by the Director or the Director's 20    designee. Satisfactory completion of the training shall be 21    evidenced by a certificate issued by the Division of the 22    Academy and Training.23        (8) Safe2Help; training. The Division of the Academy 24    and Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 25    Investigation to ensure all program personnel or call 26    center staff, or both, are appropriately trained in the   SB3597 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    areas described in subsection (f) of Section 10 of the 2    Student Confidential Reporting Act. (10)3    (c-5) In-service training.4        (1) At least once, the Division of the Academy and 5    Training shall develop and require the following 6    in-service training opportunities to be completed by 7    Illinois State Police officers:8            (A) Cell phone medical information; training. 9        Training required under this subparagraph (A) shall 10        provide instruction on accessing and using medical 11        information stored in cell phones. The Division may 12        use the program approved under Section 2310-711 of the 13        Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of 14        the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to develop 15        the Division's program.16            (B) Autism spectrum disorders; training. Training 17        required under this subparagraph (B) shall instruct 18        Illinois State Police officers on the nature of autism 19        spectrum disorders and in identifying and 20        appropriately responding to individuals with autism 21        spectrum disorders. The Illinois State Police shall 22        review the training curriculum and may consult with 23        the Department of Public Health or the Department of 24        Human Services to update the training curriculum as 25        needed.26        (2) At least every year, the Division of the Academy   SB3597 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    and Training shall provide the following in-service 2    training to Illinois State Police officers:3            (A) Cultural diversity; training.4                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 5            (A) shall provide training and continuing 6            education to Illinois State Police officers 7            concerning cultural diversity, including topics 8            such as sensitivity toward racial and ethnic 9            differences.10                (ii) This training and continuing education 11            shall, among other things, emphasize that the 12            primary purpose of enforcement of the Illinois 13            Vehicle Code is safety and equal, uniform, and 14            non-discriminatory enforcement of the law.15            (B) Minimum annual in-service training 16        requirements. Minimum annual in-service training 17        includes:18                (i) crisis intervention training;19                (ii) emergency medical response training and 20            certification;21                (iii) firearm qualification training;22                (iv) law updates; and23                (v) officer wellness and mental health.24            (C) Firearms restraining orders; training. 25        Training required under this subparagraph (C) shall 26        provide instruction on the processes used to file a   SB3597 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1        firearms restraining order, to identify situations in 2        which a firearms restraining order is appropriate, and 3        to safely promote the usage of the firearms 4        restraining order in different situations.5        (3) At least every 3 years, the Division of the 6    Academy and Training shall provide the following 7    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:8            (A) Arrest and use of force and control tactics; 9        training. Training required under this subparagraph 10        (A) shall provide to Illinois State Police officers 11        training and continuing education concerning knowledge 12        of policies and laws regulating the use of force; 13        shall equip officers with tactics and skills, 14        including de-escalation techniques, to prevent or 15        reduce the need to use force or, when force must be 16        used, to use force that is objectively reasonable, 17        necessary, and proportional under the totality of the 18        circumstances; and shall ensure appropriate 19        supervision and accountability. The training shall 20        consist of at least 30 hours and shall include:21                (i) at least 12 hours of hands-on, 22            scenario-based role-playing;23                (ii) at least 6 hours of instruction on use of 24            force techniques, including the use of 25            de-escalation techniques to prevent or reduce the 26            need for force whenever safe and feasible;  SB3597 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1                (iii) specific training on the law concerning 2            stops, searches, and the use of force under the 3            Fourth Amendment to the United States 4            Constitution;5                (iv) specific training on officer safety 6            techniques, including cover, concealment, and 7            time; and8                (v) at least 6 hours of training focused on 9            high-risk traffic stops.10            (A-5) Human trafficking; training. The Division of 11        the Academy and Training shall cooperate with the 12        Division of Criminal Investigation to provide a 13        specialized human trafficking training program for 14        Illinois State Police officers as required by Section 15        2605-635. 16            (B) Minimum triennial in-service training 17        requirements. Minimum triennial in-service training 18        required this under subparagraph (B) includes training 19        and continuing education to Illinois State Police 20        officers concerning:21                (i) constitutional and proper use of law 22            enforcement authority;23                (ii) civil and human rights;24                (iii) cultural competency, including implicit 25            bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity; and26                (iv) procedural justice;  SB3597 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1                (v) autism-informed law enforcement responses, 2            techniques, and procedures; and 3                (vi) trauma-informed programs, procedures, and 4            practices meant to minimize traumatization of the 5            victims.6            (C) Mandated reporter; training. Training required 7        under this subparagraph (C) must be approved by the 8        Department of Children and Family Services as provided 9        under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 10        Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting 11        of child abuse and neglect.12            (D) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training.13                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 14            (D) shall include in-service training on sexual 15            assault and sexual abuse response and training on 16            report writing requirements, including, but not 17            limited to, the following:18                    (a) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;19                    (b) understanding the role trauma has 20                played in a victim's life;21                    (c) responding to the needs and concerns 22                of a victim;23                    (d) delivering services in a 24                compassionate, sensitive, and nonjudgmental 25                manner;26                    (e) interviewing techniques in accordance   SB3597 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1                with the curriculum standards in subdivision 2                (iii) of this subparagraph;3                    (f) understanding cultural perceptions and 4                common myths of sexual assault and sexual 5                abuse; and6                    (g) report writing techniques in 7                accordance with the curriculum standards in 8                subdivision (iii) of this subparagraph and the 9                Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act;10                    (h) recognizing special sensitivities of 11                victims due to age, including those under the 12                age of 13; race; color; creed; religion; 13                ethnicity; gender; sexual orientation; 14                physical or mental disabilities; immigration 15                status; national origin; justice involvement; 16                past human trafficking victimization or 17                involvement in the sex trade; or other 18                qualifications;19                    (i) identifying conflicts of interest and 20                options to address those conflicts when a 21                responding or investigating officer is 22                familiar with the victim or accused; and23                    (j) screening victims of sexual assault 24                and sexual abuse for human trafficking.25                (ii) Instructors providing training under this 26            subparagraph (D) (G) shall have successfully   SB3597 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1            completed training on evidence-based, 2            trauma-informed, victim-centered responses to 3            cases of sexual assault and sexual abuse and shall 4            have experience responding to sexual assault and 5            sexual abuse cases.6                (iii) The Illinois State Police shall adopt 7            rules, in consultation with the Office of the 8            Attorney General and the Illinois Law Enforcement 9            Training Standards Board, to determine the 10            specific training requirements. The rules adopted 11            by the Illinois State Police shall include, at a 12            minimum, both of the following:13                    (a) evidence-based curriculum standards 14                for report writing and immediate response to 15                sexual assault and sexual abuse, including 16                trauma-informed, victim-centered interview 17                techniques, which have been demonstrated to 18                minimize retraumatization, for all Illinois 19                State Police officers; and20                    (b) evidence-based curriculum standards 21                for trauma-informed, victim-centered 22                investigation and interviewing techniques, 23                which have been demonstrated to minimize 24                retraumatization, for cases of sexual assault 25                and sexual abuse for all Illinois State Police 26                officers who conduct sexual assault and sexual   SB3597 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1                abuse investigations.2        (4) At least every 5 years, the Division of the 3    Academy and Training shall provide the following 4    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:5            (A) Psychology of domestic violence; training. 6        Training under this subparagraph (A) shall provide aid 7        in understanding the actions of domestic violence 8        victims and abusers and the actions needed to prevent 9        further victimization of those who have been abused. 10        The training shall focus specifically on looking 11        beyond physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 12        violence situations by studying the dynamics of the 13        aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 14        claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 15        assessing the long-term effects of domestic violence 16        situations.17    (c-10) Cadet training. The Division of the Academy and 18Training shall provide the following basic training to 19Illinois State Police cadets or ensure the following training 20was completed prior to an Illinois State Police cadet becoming 21an Illinois State Police officer:22        (1) Animal fighting awareness and humane response; 23    training. Training required under this paragraph (1) shall 24    include a training program in animal fighting awareness 25    and humane response for Illinois State Police cadets. The 26    purpose of that training shall be for Illinois State   SB3597 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    Police officers to identify animal fighting operations and 2    respond appropriately. Training under this paragraph (1) 3    shall include a humane response component that provides 4    guidelines for appropriate law enforcement response to 5    animal abuse, cruelty, and neglect, or similar condition, 6    as well as training on canine behavior and nonlethal ways 7    to subdue a canine.8        (2) Arrest and use of force and control tactics and 9    officer safety; training. Training required under this 10    paragraph (2) must include, without limitation, training 11    on officer safety techniques, such as cover, concealment, 12    and time.13        (3) Arrest of a parent or an immediate family member; 14    training. Training required under this paragraph (3) shall 15    instruct Illinois State Police cadets on trauma-informed 16    responses designed to ensure the physical safety and 17    well-being of a child of an arrested parent or immediate 18    family member, which must include, without limitation: (A) 19    training in understanding the trauma experienced by the 20    child while maintaining the integrity of the arrest and 21    safety of officers, suspects, and other involved 22    individuals; (B) training in de-escalation tactics that 23    would include the use of force when reasonably necessary; 24    and (C) training in understanding and inquiring whether a 25    child will require supervision and care.26        (4) Autism and other developmental or physical   SB3597 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    disabilities; training. Training required under this 2    paragraph (4) shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets 3    on identifying and interacting with persons with autism 4    and other developmental or physical disabilities, reducing 5    barriers to reporting crimes against persons with autism, 6    and addressing the unique challenges presented by cases 7    involving victims or witnesses with autism and other 8    developmental disabilities.9        (5) Cell phone medical information; training. Training 10    required under this paragraph (5) shall instruct Illinois 11    State Police cadets to access and use medical information 12    stored in cell phones. The Division of the Academy and 13    Training may use the program approved under Section 14    2310-711 of the Department of Public Health Powers and 15    Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to 16    develop the training required under this paragraph (5). 17        (6) Compliance with the Health Care Violence 18    Prevention Act; training. Training required under this 19    paragraph (6) shall provide an appropriate level of 20    training for Illinois State Police cadets concerning the 21    Health Care Violence Prevention Act.22        (7) Constitutional law; training. Training required 23    under this paragraph (7) shall instruct Illinois State 24    Police cadets on constitutional and proper use of law 25    enforcement authority, procedural justice, civil rights, 26    human rights, and cultural competency, including implicit   SB3597 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity.2        (8) Courtroom testimony; training.3        (9) Crime victims; training. Training required under 4    this paragraph (9) shall provide instruction in techniques 5    designed to promote effective communication at the initial 6    contact with crime victims and to comprehensively explain 7    to victims and witnesses their rights under the Rights of 8    Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and the Crime Victims 9    Compensation Act.10        (10) Criminal law; training.11        (11) Crisis intervention team and mental health 12    awareness; training. Training required under this 13    paragraph (11) shall include a specialty certification 14    course of at least 40 hours, addressing specialized 15    policing responses to people with mental illnesses. The 16    Division of the Academy and Training shall conduct Crisis 17    Intervention Team training programs that train officers to 18    identify signs and symptoms of mental illness, to 19    de-escalate situations involving individuals who appear to 20    have a mental illness and connect individuals in crisis to 21    treatment.22        (12) Cultural diversity; training.23            (A) The training required under this paragraph 24        (12) shall provide training to Illinois State Police 25        cadets concerning cultural competency and cultural 26        diversity, including sensitivity toward racial and   SB3597 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1        ethnic differences.2            (B) This training shall include, but not be 3        limited to, an emphasis on the fact that the primary 4        purpose of enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle Code is 5        safety, equal, and uniform and non-discriminatory 6        enforcement under the law.7        (13) De-escalation and use of force; training. 8    Training required under this paragraph (13) must consist 9    of at least 6 hours of instruction on use of force 10    techniques, including the use of de-escalation techniques 11    to prevent or reduce the need for force whenever safe and 12    feasible.13        (14) Domestic violence; training. Training required 14    under this paragraph (14) shall provide aid in 15    understanding the actions of domestic violence victims and 16    abusers and to prevent further victimization of those who 17    have been abused, focusing specifically on looking beyond 18    the physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 19    violence situations, such as the dynamics of the 20    aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 21    claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 22    long-term effects.23        (15) Effective recognition of and responses to stress, 24    trauma, and post-traumatic stress; training. Training 25    required under this paragraph (15) shall instruct Illinois 26    State Police cadets to recognize and respond to stress,   SB3597 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    trauma, and post-traumatic stress experienced by law 2    enforcement officers. The training must be consistent with 3    Section 25 of the Illinois Mental Health First Aid 4    Training Act in a peer setting, including recognizing 5    signs and symptoms of work-related cumulative stress, 6    issues that may lead to suicide, and solutions for 7    intervention with peer support resources.8        (16) Elder abuse; training. Training required under 9    this paragraph (16) shall teach Illinois State Police 10    cadets to recognize neglect and financial exploitation 11    against the elderly and adults with disabilities. The 12    training shall also teach Illinois State Police cadets to 13    recognize self-neglect by the elderly and adults with 14    disabilities. In this subparagraph, "adults with 15    disabilities" has the meaning given to that term in the 16    Adult Protective Services Act.17        (17) Electronic control devices; training. Training 18    required under this paragraph (17) shall include training 19    in the use of electronic control devices, including the 20    psychological and physiological effects of the use of 21    those devices on humans.22        (18) Epinephrine auto-injector administration; 23    training. Training required under this paragraph (18) 24    shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to recognize 25    and respond to anaphylaxis. The training must comply with 26    subsection (c) of Section 40 of the Illinois State Police   SB3597 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    Act.2        (19) Evidence collection; training. Training required 3    under this paragraph (19) must include proper procedures 4    for collecting, handling, and preserving evidence, and 5    rules of law.6        (20) Firearms restraining orders; training. Providing 7    instruction on the process used to file a firearms 8    restraining order and how to identify situations in which 9    a firearms restraining order is appropriate and how to 10    safely promote the usage of the firearms restraining order 11    in different situations.12        (21) Firearms; training. Successful completion of a 13    40-hour course of training in use of a suitable type 14    firearm shall be a condition precedent to the possession 15    and use of that respective firearm in connection with the 16    officer's official duties. To satisfy the requirements of 17    this Act, the training must include the following:18            (A) Instruction in the dangers of misuse of the 19        firearm, safety rules, and care and cleaning of the 20        firearm.21            (B) Practice firing on a range and qualification 22        with the firearm in accordance with the standards 23        established by the Board.24            (C) Instruction in the legal use of firearms under 25        the Criminal Code of 2012 and relevant court 26        decisions.  SB3597 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1            (D) A forceful presentation of the ethical and 2        moral considerations assumed by any person who uses a 3        firearm.4        (22) First-aid; training. First-aid training must 5    include cardiopulmonary resuscitation.6        (23) Hate crimes; training. Training required under 7    this paragraph (23) shall instruct Illinois State Police 8    cadets in identifying, responding to, and reporting all 9    hate crimes.10        (24) High-risk traffic stops; training. Training 11    required under this paragraph (24) must consist of at 12    least 6 hours of training focused on high-risk traffic 13    stops.14        (25) High-speed vehicle chase; training. Training 15    required under this paragraph (25) shall instruct Illinois 16    State Police cadets on the hazards of high-speed police 17    vehicle chases with an emphasis on alternatives to the 18    high-speed vehicle chase.19        (26) Human relations; training.20        (27) Human trafficking; training. Training required 21    under this paragraph (27) shall instruct Illinois State 22    Police cadets in the detection, and investigation, and 23    victim-centered, trauma-informed responses to victims of 24    all forms of human trafficking, including, but not limited 25    to, involuntary servitude under subsection (b) of Section 26    10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012, involuntary sexual   SB3597 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    servitude of a minor under subsection (c) of Section 10-9 2    of the Criminal Code of 2012, and trafficking in persons 3    under subsection (d) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code 4    of 2012. This program shall be made available to all 5    cadets and Illinois State Police officers.6        (28) Juvenile law; training. Training required under 7    this paragraph (28) shall instruct Illinois State Police 8    cadets on juvenile law and the proper processing and 9    handling of juvenile offenders.10        (29) Mandated reporter; training. Training required 11    under this paragraph (29) must be approved by the 12    Department of Children and Family Services as provided 13    under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 14    Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting of 15    child abuse and neglect.16        (30) Mental conditions and crises, training. Training 17    required under this paragraph (30) shall include, without 18    limitation, (A) recognizing the disease of addiction, (B) 19    recognizing situations which require immediate assistance, 20    and (C) responding in a manner that safeguards and 21    provides assistance to individuals in need of mental 22    treatment.23        (31) Officer wellness and suicide prevention; 24    training. The training required under this paragraph (31) 25    shall include instruction on job-related stress management 26    techniques, skills for recognizing signs and symptoms of   SB3597 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    work-related cumulative stress, recognition of other 2    issues that may lead to officer suicide, solutions for 3    intervention, and a presentation on available peer support 4    resources.5        (32) Officer-worn body cameras; training.6            (A) As used in this paragraph (32), "officer-worn 7        body camera" has the meaning given to that term in 8        Article 10 of the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body 9        Camera Act.10            (B) The training required under this paragraph 11        (32) shall provide training in the use of officer-worn 12        body cameras to cadets who will use officer-worn body 13        cameras.14        (33) Opioid antagonists; training.15            (A) As used in this paragraph (33), "opioid 16        antagonist" has the meaning given to that term in 17        subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the Substance Use 18        Disorder Act.19            (B) Training required under this paragraph (33) 20        shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to 21        administer opioid antagonists.22        (34) Persons arrested while under the influence of 23    alcohol or drugs; training. Training required under this 24    paragraph (34) shall comply with Illinois State Police 25    policy adopted under Section 2605-54. The training shall 26    be consistent with the Substance Use Disorder Act and   SB3597 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    shall provide guidance for the arrest of persons under the 2    influence of alcohol or drugs, proper medical attention if 3    warranted, and care and release of those persons from 4    custody. The training shall provide guidance concerning 5    the release of persons arrested under the influence of 6    alcohol or drugs who are under the age of 21 years of age, 7    which shall include, but shall not be limited to, 8    instructions requiring the arresting officer to make a 9    reasonable attempt to contact a responsible adult who is 10    willing to take custody of the person who is under the 11    influence of alcohol or drugs.12        (35) Physical training.13        (36) Post-traumatic stress disorder; training. 14    Training required under this paragraph (36) shall equip 15    Illinois State Police cadets to identify the symptoms of 16    post-traumatic stress disorder and to respond 17    appropriately to individuals exhibiting those symptoms.18        (37) Report writing; training. Training required under 19    this paragraph (37) shall instruct Illinois State Police 20    cadets on writing reports and proper documentation of 21    statements.22        (38) Scenario training. At least 12 hours of hands-on, 23    scenario-based role-playing.24        (39) Search and seizure; training. Training required 25    under this paragraph (39) shall instruct Illinois State 26    Police cadets on search and seizure, including temporary   SB3597 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    questioning.2        (40) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training. 3    Training required under this paragraph (40) shall instruct 4    Illinois State Police cadets on sexual assault and sexual 5    abuse response and report writing training requirements, 6    including, but not limited to, the following:7            (A) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;8            (B) understanding the role trauma has played in a 9        victim's life;10            (C) responding to the needs and concerns of a 11        victim;12            (D) delivering services in a compassionate, 13        sensitive, and nonjudgmental manner;14            (E) interviewing techniques in accordance with the 15        curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 16        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act;17            (F) understanding cultural perceptions and common 18        myths of sexual assault and sexual abuse; and19            (G) report-writing techniques in accordance with 20        the curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 21        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act and the 22        Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act;23            (H) recognizing special sensitivities of victims 24        due to age, including those under the age of 13; race; 25        color; creed; religion; ethnicity; gender; sexual 26        orientation; physical or mental disabilities;   SB3597 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1        immigration status; national origin; justice 2        involvement; past human trafficking victimization or 3        involvement in the sex trade; or other qualifications;4            (I) identifying conflicts of interest and options 5        to address those conflicts when a responding or 6        investigating officer is familiar with the victim or 7        accused; and8            (J) screening of victims of sexual assault and 9        sexual abuse for human trafficking.10        (41) Traffic control and crash investigation; 11    training. 12    (d) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 13administer and conduct a program consistent with 18 U.S.C. 14926B and 926C for qualified active and retired Illinois State 15Police officers. 16(Source: P.A. 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 103-939, eff. 1-1-25; 17103-949, eff. 1-1-25; 104-24, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 188-15-25; revised 9-10-25.) 19    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-52)20    Sec. 2605-52. Division of Statewide 9-1-1.21    (a) There shall be established an Office of the Statewide 229-1-1 Administrator within the Division of Statewide 9-1-1. 23Beginning January 1, 2016, the Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 24Administrator shall be responsible for developing, 25implementing, and overseeing a uniform statewide 9-1-1 system   SB3597 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1for all areas of the State outside of municipalities having a 2population over 500,000.3    (b) The Governor shall appoint, with the advice and 4consent of the Senate, a Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator. The 5Administrator shall serve for a term of 2 years and until a 6successor is appointed and qualified; except that the term of 7the first 9-1-1 Administrator appointed under this Act shall 8expire on the third Monday in January, 2017. The Administrator 9shall not hold any other remunerative public office. The 10Administrator shall receive an annual salary as set by the 11Governor. 12    (c) The Illinois State Police, from appropriations made to 13it for that purpose, shall make grants to 9-1-1 Authorities 14for the purpose of defraying costs associated with 9-1-1 15system consolidations awarded by the Administrator under 16Section 15.4b of the Emergency Telephone System Act. 17    (d) The Division of Statewide 9-1-1 shall exercise the 18rights, powers, and duties vested by law in the Illinois State 19Police by the Illinois State Police Radio Act and shall 20oversee the Illinois State Police radio network, including the 21Illinois State Police Emergency Radio Network and Illinois 22State Police's STARCOM21.23    (e) The Division of Statewide 9-1-1 shall also conduct the 24following communication activities:25        (1) Acquire and operate one or more radio broadcasting 26    stations in the State to be used for police purposes.  SB3597 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1        (2) Operate a statewide communications network to 2    gather and disseminate information for law enforcement 3    agencies.4        (3) Undertake other communication activities that may 5    be required by law.6        (4) Oversee Illinois State Police telecommunications.7    (f) The Division of Statewide 9-1-1 shall oversee the 8Illinois State Police fleet operations.9    (g) The Division of Statewide 9-1-1 shall cooperate with 10federal and State authorities that are engaged in aeronautics 11and that request to use the Illinois State Police's radio 12network system.13(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 14103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 15    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-350)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part)16    Sec. 2605-350. Juveniles; police contact recordkeeping 17record keeping system. The Illinois State Police shall 18maintain a To develop a separate statewide statistical police 19contact recordkeeping record keeping system for the study of 20juvenile delinquency. The reports records of this police 21contact system shall be limited to statistical information. No 22individually identifiable information shall be included in any 23report maintained in the police contact statistical record 24system.25(Source: P.A. 90-18, eff. 7-1-97; 90-130, eff. 1-1-98; 90-372,   SB3597 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1eff. 7-1-98; 90-590, eff. 1-1-00; 90-655, eff. 7-30-98; 290-793, eff. 8-14-98; 91-239, eff. 1-1-00.) 3    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-505 rep.)4    Section 10. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by repealing 6Section 2605-505. 7    Section 15. The Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement 8Act is amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 9    (30 ILCS 715/3)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1703)10    Sec. 3. A Metropolitan Enforcement Group which meets the 11minimum criteria established in this Section is eligible to 12receive State grants to help defray the costs of operation. To 13be eligible a MEG must:14        (1) Be established and operating pursuant to 15    intergovernmental contracts written and executed in 16    conformity with the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act, and 17    involve 2 or more units of local government.18        (2) Establish a MEG Policy Board composed of an 19    elected official, or his designee, and the chief law 20    enforcement officer, or his designee, from each 21    participating unit of local government to oversee the 22    operations of the MEG and make such reports to the 23    Illinois State Police as the Illinois State Police may   SB3597 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    require.2        (3) Designate a single appropriate elected official of 3    a participating unit of local government to act as the 4    financial officer of the MEG for all participating units 5    of local government and to receive funds for the operation 6    of the MEG.7        (4) Limit its operations to enforcement of drug laws; 8    enforcement of Sections 10-9, 12-9, 24-1, 24-1.1, 24-1.2, 9    24-1.2-5, 24-1.5, 24-1.7, 24-1.8, 24-2.1, 24-2.2, 24-3, 10    24-3.1, 24-3.2, 24-3.3, 24-3.4, 24-3.5, 24-3.7, 24-3.8, 11    24-3.9, 24-3A, 24-3B, 24-4, and 24-5, and 29D of the 12    Criminal Code of 2012; Sections 2, 3, 6.1, 9.5, and 14 of 13    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act; protection of 14    federal and state officials; and the investigation of 15    streetgang related offenses.16        (5) Cooperate with the Illinois State Police in order 17    to assure compliance with this Act and to enable the 18    Illinois State Police to fulfill its duties under this 19    Act, and supply the Illinois State Police with all 20    information the Illinois State Police deems necessary 21    therefor.22        (6) Receive funding of at least 50% of the total 23    operating budget of the MEG from the participating units 24    of local government, which may include grants or funding 25    received through intergovernmental agreement with any 26    other unit of federal, State, or local government.  SB3597 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 2102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23.) 3    Section 25. The Freedom from Drone Surveillance Act is 4amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 5    (725 ILCS 167/15)6    Sec. 15. Exceptions. This Act does not prohibit the use of 7a drone by a law enforcement agency:8        (1) To counter a high risk of a terrorist attack by a 9    specific individual or organization if the United States 10    Secretary of Homeland Security determines that credible 11    intelligence indicates that there is that risk.12        (2) If a law enforcement agency first obtains a search 13    warrant based on probable cause issued under Section 108-3 14    of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. The warrant 15    must be limited to a period of 45 days, renewable by the 16    judge upon a showing of good cause for subsequent periods 17    of 45 days.18        (3) If a law enforcement agency possesses reasonable 19    suspicion that, under particular circumstances, swift 20    action is needed to prevent imminent harm to life, or to 21    forestall the imminent escape of a suspect or the 22    destruction of evidence. The use of a drone under this 23    paragraph (3) is limited to a period of 48 hours. Within 24 24    hours of the initiation of the use of a drone under this   SB3597 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    paragraph (3), the chief executive officer of the law 2    enforcement agency or the chief executive officer's 3    designee must report in writing the use of a drone to the 4    local State's Attorney.5        (4) If a law enforcement agency is not undertaking a 6    criminal investigation but is attempting to locate a 7    missing person, engaging in search and rescue operations, 8    or aiding a person who cannot otherwise be safely reached.9        (5) If a law enforcement agency is using a drone 10    solely for crime scene and traffic crash scene 11    photography. Crime scene and traffic crash photography 12    must be conducted in a geographically confined and 13    time-limited manner to document specific occurrences. The 14    use of a drone under this paragraph (5) on private 15    property requires either a search warrant based on 16    probable cause under Section 108-3 of the Code of Criminal 17    Procedure of 1963 or lawful consent to search. The use of a 18    drone under this paragraph (5) on lands, highways, 19    roadways, or areas belonging to this State or political 20    subdivisions of this State does not require a search 21    warrant or consent to search. Any law enforcement agency 22    operating a drone under this paragraph (5) shall make 23    every reasonable attempt to only photograph the crime 24    scene or traffic crash scene and avoid other areas. 25        (6) If a law enforcement agency is using a drone 26    during a disaster or public health emergency, as defined   SB3597 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    by Section 4 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 2    Act. The use of a drone under this paragraph (6) does not 3    require an official declaration of a disaster or public 4    health emergency prior to use. A law enforcement agency 5    may use a drone under this paragraph (6) to obtain 6    information necessary for the determination of whether or 7    not a disaster or public health emergency should be 8    declared, to monitor weather or emergency conditions, to 9    survey damage, or to otherwise coordinate response and 10    recovery efforts. The use of a drone under this paragraph 11    (6) is permissible during the disaster or public health 12    emergency and during subsequent response and recovery 13    efforts. 14        (7) To conduct an infrastructure inspection of a 15    designated building or structure at the express request of 16    a local government agency. Any law enforcement agency 17    operating a drone under this paragraph (7) shall make 18    every reasonable attempt to photograph only the building 19    or structure and to avoid other areas.20        (8) To demonstrate the capabilities and functionality 21    of a police drone for public relations purposes, provided 22    that no information is collected or recorded by the drone 23    during such demonstration. 24        (9) In response to Public Safety Answering Point 25    (PSAP) dispatched calls for service, when the sole purpose 26    for using a drone is for one or more first responders to   SB3597 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1    locate victims, to assist with immediate victim health or 2    safety needs, or to coordinate the response of emergency 3    vehicles and personnel to an emergency. As used in this 4    paragraph (9), "Public Safety Answering Point" and "PSAP" 5    have the meaning given to those terms in Section 2 of the 6    Emergency Telephone System Act.7        (10) If a law enforcement agency is using a drone at a 8    routed event or special event. The use of a drone under 9    this paragraph (10) requires that:10            (A) notice is posted at the event location for at 11        least 24 hours before the event and clearly 12        communicates that drones may be used at the upcoming 13        event for the purpose of real-time monitoring of 14        participant safety;15            (B) notice is posted, if practical, at major entry 16        points to the event clearly informing the attendees 17        that a drone may be used for the purpose of real-time 18        monitoring of participant safety; and 19            (C) the drone is flown in accordance with Federal 20        Aviation Administration safety regulations.21        Under this paragraph (10), a law enforcement agency 22    may use the drone:23            (i) in advance of an event, before event 24        participants have begun to assemble, for the sole 25        purpose of creating maps and determining appropriate 26        access routes, staging areas, and traffic routes,   SB3597 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1        provided that no personal identifying information is 2        recorded and provided further that no recorded 3        information is used in any criminal prosecution; or4            (ii) during the event to proactively support 5        public safety personnel by monitoring the event 6        footprint in real time:7                (I) to detect a breach of event space, 8            including a breach by an unauthorized vehicle, an 9            interruption of a parade route, or a breach of an 10            event barricade or fencing;11                (II) to evaluate crowd size and density;12                (III) to identify activity that could present 13            a public safety issue for the crowd as a whole, 14            including crowd movement;15                (IV) to assist in the response of public 16            safety personnel to a real-time public safety 17            incident at the event; and18                (V) to assess the traffic and pedestrian flow 19            around the event in real time.20(Source: P.A. 103-101, eff. 6-16-23.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.  SB3597 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 17709 RTM 31140 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 2605/2605-30was 20 ILCS 2605/55a-24    20 ILCS 2605/2605-515    20 ILCS 2605/2605-526    20 ILCS 2605/2605-350was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part7    20 ILCS 2605/2605-5758    20 ILCS 2605/2605-505 rep.9    30 ILCS 715/3from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 170310    725 ILCS 5/115-1511    725 ILCS 167/15